Utah statutes.
34-36-2.   Motor vehicles of employers -- Rules.

(1)  The Labor Commission shall make and enforce reasonable rules relating to motor vehicles used to transport workers to and from their places of employment.  These rules shall be embodied in a safety code and shall establish minimum standards.

(2) (a)  A person who is an employee of an electrical corporation, a gas corporation, or a telephone corporation, as these corporations are defined in Section 54-2-1, is exempt from any hours of service rules and regulations for drivers while operating a public utility vehicle within the state during the emergency restoration of public utility service.

(b)  As used in Subsection (2)(a), "emergency" means a condition that jeopardizes life or property, or that endangers public health and safety.

